Utah statutes.
63H-4-107.   Notes, bonds, other obligation -- Not debt liability -- Expenses payable from funds provided -- Agency without authority to incur liability on behalf of state.

(1) (a)  An obligation or liability of the authority does not constitute a debt or liability of this state or of any of its political subdivisions nor does any obligation or liability constitute the loaning of credit of the state or of any of its political subdivisions nor may any obligation or liability of the authority be payable from funds other than those of the authority.

(b)  All obligations of the authority shall contain a statement to the effect that the authority is obligated to pay them solely from the revenues or other funds of the authority and that this state or its political subdivisions are not obligated to pay them and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of this state or any of its political subdivisions is pledged to the payment of them.

(2)  All expenses incurred in carrying out this part are payable solely from money of the authority provided under this chapter, and nothing in this chapter may be construed to authorize the authority to incur indebtedness or liability on behalf of or payable by this state or any of its political subdivisions.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 370, 2011 General Session

